Utah statutes.
10-2-409.5.   Municipal selection committee.
(1)  In each county in which there are two or more municipalities there shall
be a municipal selection committee consisting of the mayor of each
municipality.
(2)  A majority of the members of the municipal selection committee
constitutes a quorum.
(3)  The municipal selection committee shall appoint each municipal member of
the county boundary commission under Subsection 10-2-409(2)(a)(iii) and fill
each vacancy in that position as it occurs.
